Utah statutes.
17-22-14.   Failure to levy execution -- Penalty.
If the sheriff to whom a writ of execution is delivered neglects or refuses,
after being required by the creditor or his attorney, the fees having first
been paid or tendered, to levy upon or sell any property of the party charged
in the writ which is liable to be levied upon and sold, he shall be liable to
the creditor for the value of such property.
